Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1139.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-24.7 of the General Laws entitled "Outdoor Dining Act" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24.7-5. Temporary outdoor dining services.
(a) Any time a building or other structure used as a food service establishment, is rendered
uninhabitable by virtue of a casualty including, but not limited to, fire or flood, the food service
establishment may, upon approval of the city or town council, provide temporary outdoor dining
services for a period of up to eighteen (18) months from the date of approval received from the city
or town council, or until the building or structure is rehabilitated and otherwise made fit for
occupancy, as long as the location of the temporary outdoor dining area complies with applicable
state health and life safety regulations. The temporary outdoor dining service shall be permitted,
notwithstanding any municipal ordinance, including zoning or planning regulations to the contrary,
and if the municipality has issued a liquor license for the food service establishment, the license
may be used in conjunction with the temporary outdoor dining service.
(b) Unless extended by the general assembly, the provisions of this section shall sunset and
expire on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003045
========